Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5619.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-1.7 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Program to
Address Alzheimer’s Disease" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-1.7-7. Education and outreach regarding brain health and dementia.
(a) The department of health, in consultation with the advisory council created pursuant to
§ 23-1.7-2, shall incorporate information about brain health, dementia risk factors and risk
reduction, Alzheimer’s disease, and other dementias into existing public health outreach programs
to:
(1) Increase public understanding and awareness of:
(i) Brain health and dementia risk reduction;
(ii) Early warning signs of Alzheimer’s disease and other dementias;
(iii) The value of early detection and timely diagnosis; and
(iv) The relationship between Alzheimer’s disease, dementia, and other chronic health
conditions.
(2) Ensure public awareness and outreach programs:
(i) Provide clear, uniform guidance in nonclinical terms; and
(ii) Prioritize populations at greater risk of developing Alzheimer’s disease and other
dementias.
(b) The department of health, in consultation with the advisory council created pursuant to

§ 23-1.7-2, shall incorporate information about brain health, dementia risk factors and risk
reduction, Alzheimer’s disease, and other dementias into existing healthcare provider education
and outreach programs to educate providers regarding:
(1) The importance of risk reduction, early detection, and timely diagnosis of cognitive
impairment and dementia;
(2) Validated assessment tools for the detection and diagnosis of cognitive impairment;
(3) The value of validated cognitive assessment tools during Medicare annual wellness
visits; and
(4) Medicare care planning billing codes for individuals with cognitive impairment,
provision of effective care planning, and available treatments.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001918
========
LC001918 - Page 2 of 3